Utah statutes.
41-12a-305.   Assigned risk plan.

Section 31A-22-310 applies to an assigned risk plan.  This continues the assigned risk plan established under Chapter 242, Laws of Utah 1985, with any modifications from Title 31A, Insurance Code.



Amended by Chapter 306, 2007 General Session

